src/fst/morphology/incoming/bop-translit.xfst
define Trans [~$[a|á|b|v|g|d|e|é|z|ž|i|í|j|k|l|m|n|o|ó|p|r|s|t|u|ú|f|x|c|č|š|y|ý]]
.o.
[а -> a,
б -> b,
в -> v,
г -> g,
д -> d,
е -> e,
ж -> ž,
з -> z,
и -> i,
ј -> j,
к -> k,
л -> l,
м -> m,
н -> n,
о -> o,
п -> p,
р -> r,
с -> s,
т -> t,
у -> u,
ф -> f,
х -> x,
ц -> c,
ч -> č,
ш -> š,
щ -> [š t],
ъ -> y,
¶ -> %# || _,,
ю -> {ju},
я -> {ja} ||.#. _];
